trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
    <pardef n="umf/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørini</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørini</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ør</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ør</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørum</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørunum</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="álv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arinnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eykafíggjarlóg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arinnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fíggjarlóg"><i>fíggjarlóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="búnaðarnevnd"><i>búnaðarnevnd</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grundlóg"><i>grundlóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baðikar"><i>baðik</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yvirtøkulóg"><i>yvirtøkulóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnaverndarnevnd"><i>barnaverndarnevnd</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skúlaskeið"><i>skúlaskeið</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjólóg"><i>sjólóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirkjulóg"><i>kirkjulóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lóg"><i>lóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="býarskipanardeild"><i>býarskipanardeild</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fosturtøkulóg"><i>fosturtøkulóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saltkar"><i>saltk</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heildarætlan"><i>heildarætlan</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjølmiðlalóg"><i>fjølmiðlalóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ferðslulóg"><i>ferðslulóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjálvstýrislóg"><i>sjálvstýrislóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eyskar"><i>eysk</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roknskaparreglugerð"><i>roknskaparreglugerð</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tóvarakar"><i>tóvarak</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loyvisumfar"><i>loyvisumf</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vápnalóg"><i>vápnalóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="revsilóg"><i>revsilóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="býarskipanarnevnd"><i>býarskipanarnevnd</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ríkislóg"><i>ríkislóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrisitingarlóg"><i>fyrisitingarlóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heimastýrislóg"><i>heimastýrislóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skattalóg"><i>skattalóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rammulóg"><i>rammulóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="álv"><i>álv</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landkar"><i>landk</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undirskrift"><i>undirskrift</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tídd"><i>tídd</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eykajáttanarlóg"><i>eykajáttanarlóg</i><par n="eykafíggjarlóg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="løgtingslóg"><i>løgtingslóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskakar"><i>fiskak</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eykafíggjarlóg"><i>eykafíggjarlóg</i><par n="eykafíggjarlóg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kommunulæknaskipan"><i>kommunulæknaskipan</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umfar"><i>umf</i><par n="umf/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vallóg"><i>vallóg</i><par n="álv__n"/></e>
